New York, session 2025-2026, S2631.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations requiring 4 all public elementary schools within the state to start no earlier than 5 eight a.m. and all public secondary schools within the state to start no 6 earlier than eight thirty a.m. 7 § 2. Section 3604 of the education law is amended by adding a new 8 subdivision 8-a to read as follows: 9 8-a. a. No public elementary school within the state shall be enti- 10 tled to any portion of such school moneys on such apportionment unless 11 the report of the trustees or board of education for the preceding 12 school year shall show that such public elementary school started no 13 earlier than eight a.m. 14 b. No public high school within the state shall be entitled to any 15 portion of such school moneys on such apportionment unless the report of 16 the trustees or board of education for the preceding school year shall 17 show that such public secondary schools started no earlier than eight 18 thirty a.m. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 20 academic years beginning on and after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06985-02-5